Idaho, session 2026, S1409.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Idaho State Police the following amounts
to be expended according to the designated programs and expense classes from
the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30, 2027:
FOR FOR
OPERATING CAPITAL
EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
I. BRAND INSPECTION:
FROM:
State Brand Board
Fund $15,100 $273,000 $288,100
II. DIVISION OF IDAHO STATE POLICE:
A. INVESTIGATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $24,400 $24,400
B. PATROL:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,227,700 $1,417,500 $2,645,200
HazardousMaterials/WasteEnforcement
Fund 52,000 45,000 97,000
Federal Grant
Fund 613,200 180,000 793,200
TOTAL $1,892,900 $1,642,500 $3,535,400


FOR FOR
OPERATING CAPITAL
EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
C. LAW ENFORCEMENT PROGRAMS:
FROM:
Alcohol Beverage Control
Fund $58,800 $65,000 $123,800
D. SUPPORT SERVICES:
FROM:
IdahoLawEnforcementTelecommunications
Fund $3,000 $3,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 42,000 42,000
Federal Grant
Fund 551,500 551,500
TOTAL $596,500 $596,500
DIVISION TOTAL $2,572,600 $1,707,500 $4,280,100
III. POST ACADEMY:
FROM:
Peace Officers Training
Fund $61,500 $262,600 $324,100
GRAND TOTAL $2,649,200 $2,243,100 $4,892,300
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.